src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX T Y 673
SFX T ti      t               ti        
SFX T ti      davau           ti        
SFX T ti      davai           ti        
SFX T ti      davo            ti        
SFX T ti      davome          ti        
SFX T ti      davom           ti        
SFX T ti      davote          ti        
SFX T ti      davot           ti        
SFX T tis     davausi         tis       
SFX T tis     davaisi         tis       
SFX T tis     davosi          tis       
SFX T tis     davom s         tis       
SFX T tis     davot s         tis       
SFX T ti      siu             [^s z ]ti 
SFX T ti      si              [^s z ]ti 
SFX T ti      s               [^s z ]ti 
SFX T ti      sime            [^s z ]ti 
SFX T ti      sim             [^s z ]ti 
SFX T ti      site            [^s z ]ti 
SFX T ti      sit             [^s z ]ti 
SFX T sti     siu             sti       
SFX T sti     si              sti       
SFX T sti     s               sti       
SFX T sti     sime            sti       
SFX T sti     sim             sti       
SFX T sti     site            sti       
SFX T sti     sit             sti       
SFX T ti      iu               ti       
SFX T ti      i                ti       
SFX T  ti                      ti       
SFX T ti      ime              ti       
SFX T ti      im               ti       
SFX T ti      ite              ti       
SFX T ti      it               ti       
SFX T  ti      iu              ti       
SFX T  ti      i               ti       
SFX T  ti                      ti       
SFX T  ti      ime             ti       
SFX T  ti      im              ti       
SFX T  ti      ite             ti       
SFX T  ti      it              ti       
SFX T tis     siuosi          [^s z ]tis
SFX T tis     siesi           [^s z ]tis
SFX T tis     sis             [^s z ]tis
SFX T tis     sim s           [^s z ]tis
SFX T tis     sit s           [^s z ]tis
SFX T stis    siuosi          stis      
SFX T stis    siesi           stis      
SFX T stis    sis             stis      
SFX T stis    sim s           stis      
SFX T stis    sit s           stis      
SFX T tis     iuosi            tis      
SFX T tis     iesi             tis      
SFX T  tis     is              tis      
SFX T tis     im s             tis      
SFX T tis     it s             tis      
SFX T  tis     iuosi           tis      
SFX T  tis     iesi            tis      
SFX T  tis     is              tis      
SFX T  tis     im s            tis      
SFX T  tis     it s            tis      
SFX T ti       iau            ti        
SFX T ti      tum             ti        
SFX T ti      tumei           ti        
SFX T ti      t               ti        
SFX T ti      tume            ti        
SFX T ti      tum me          ti        
SFX T ti      tum m           ti        
SFX T ti      tum te          ti        
SFX T ti      tum t           ti        
SFX T ti      tute            ti        
SFX T ti      tut             ti        
SFX T tis      iausi          tis       
SFX T tis     tumeis          tis       
SFX T tis     tumeisi         tis       
SFX T tis     t si            tis       
SFX T tis     tum s           tis       
SFX T tis     tum m s         tis       
SFX T tis     tum t s         tis       
SFX T tis     tut s           tis       
SFX T ti      k               [^kg]ti   
SFX T ti      kime            [^kg]ti   
SFX T ti      kim             [^kg]ti   
SFX T ti      kite            [^kg]ti   
SFX T ti      kit             [^kg]ti   
SFX T kti     k               kti       
SFX T kti     kime            kti       
SFX T kti     kim             kti       
SFX T kti     kite            kti       
SFX T kti     kit             kti       
SFX T gti     k               gti       
SFX T gti     kime            gti       
SFX T gti     kim             gti       
SFX T gti     kite            gti       
SFX T gti     kit             gti       
SFX T tis     kis             [^kg]tis  
SFX T tis     kim s           [^kg]tis  
SFX T tis     kit s           [^kg]tis  
SFX T ktis    kis             ktis      
SFX T ktis    kim s           ktis      
SFX T ktis    kit s           ktis      
SFX T gtis    kis             gtis      
SFX T gtis    kim s           gtis      
SFX T gtis    kit s           gtis      
SFX T ti      damas           ti        
SFX T ti      dama            ti        
SFX T ti      dami            ti        
SFX T ti      damos           ti        
SFX T tis     damasis         tis       
SFX T tis     damasi          tis       
SFX T tis     damiesi         tis       
SFX T tis     damosi          tis       
SFX T ti      davus           ti        
SFX T tis     davusis         tis       
SFX T ti      siantis         [^sz  ]ti 
SFX T sti     siantis         sti       
SFX T  ti      iantis          ti       
SFX T zti     siantis         zti       
SFX T  ti      iantis          ti       
SFX T ti      dav s           ti        
SFX T ti      davusio         ti        
SFX T ti      davusiam        ti        
SFX T ti      davus           ti        
SFX T ti      davusiu         ti        
SFX T ti      davusiame       ti        
SFX T ti      dav             ti        
SFX T ti      davusi          ti        
SFX T ti      davusiems       ti        
SFX T ti      davusius        ti        
SFX T ti      davusiais       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiuose      ti        
SFX T ti      davusi          ti        
SFX T ti      davusios        ti        
SFX T ti      davusiai        ti        
SFX T ti      davusi          ti        
SFX T ti      davusia         ti        
SFX T ti      davusioje       ti        
SFX T ti      davusioj        ti        
SFX T ti      davusioms       ti        
SFX T ti      davusias        ti        
SFX T ti      davusiomis      ti        
SFX T ti      davusiose       ti        
SFX T ti      davusysis       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiojo       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiajam      ti        
SFX T ti      davus j         ti        
SFX T ti      davusiuoju      ti        
SFX T ti      davusiajame     ti        
SFX T ti      davusieji       ti        
SFX T ti      davusi j        ti        
SFX T ti      davusiesiems    ti        
SFX T ti      davusiuosius    ti        
SFX T ti      davusiaisiais   ti        
SFX T ti      davusiuosiuose  ti        
SFX T ti      davusioji       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiosios     ti        
SFX T ti      davusiajai      ti        
SFX T ti      davusi j        ti        
SFX T ti      davusi ja       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiojoje     ti        
SFX T ti      davusiojoj      ti        
SFX T ti      davusiosioms    ti        
SFX T ti      davusi sias     ti        
SFX T ti      davusiosiomis   ti        
SFX T ti      davusiosiose    ti        
SFX T ti      si s            [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian io         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iam        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      siant           [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iu         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iame       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      si              [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian i          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      siantiems       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian ius        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iais       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iuose      [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sianti          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian ios        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iai        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian i          [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian ia         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian ioje       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian ioj        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian ioms       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian ias        [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iomis      [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iose       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      siantysis       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iojo       [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iajam      [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      siant j         [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iuoju      [^  sz]ti 
SFX T ti      sian iajame     [^  sz]ti 
