src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
aiktel ti/NTX
akmenauti/NTX
alm ti/NTXd
angl ti/NTXak
ap iurinti/STX
apibarstyti/STX
apiforminti/NTX
apkraiglioti/STX
apsidairyti/NTX
apsikai yti/STX
apsitvarstyti/STX
apval ti/NTXk
a arotis/T
atidengti/STX
atitolti/NTX
atrofuoti/STX
atsiitarnauti/STX
atsis sti/NTX
at agarioti/NTX
ausuoti/NTXa
baik tauti/NTX
balsuoti/NTXdefhkl
bark  ioti/NTX
bediev ti/NTXk
betonuoti/NTXdl
birti/NTXcdefjkl
bla kytis/T
bli voti/NTXd
boksuotis/T
bra kintis/T
brinkti/NTXdefhijkl
br zguliuoti/NTX
bujoti/NSTXdkl
bustis/T
cieps ti/NTXk
cvaktel ti/NTX
dalin ti/NTXdf
datuoti/NTX
d dinti/NTX
d koti/NTXfn
dergti/NSTXadefjklmprtvw
dezodoruoti/NTX
dildyti/NTXadefhikmpqrtw
diriguoti/NTX
dykinti/NTX
draikin ti/NTX
dr gn ti/NTX
drikstel ti/NTX
dro tel ti/NTX
duj ti/NTX
d moti/NTXf
durti/NSTXcdefhijklnopqrtuvw
dv suoti/NTX
dzing ti/NTXk
ekranizuoti/NTX
e elonuoti/NTX
fokusuoti/STXkpqrvw
gailinti/NTXo
galyn tis/T
gardinti/NTX
gaubtis/T
geldinti/NTX
gerinti/NSTXefkorvw
gimdytis/T
girk noti/NTX
gyvuotis/T
gleg ti/NTX
gludenti/NTX
gob tis/T
graibstin ti/NTX
grebezoti/NTX
griauti/NSTXacdefgklouvwx
gr stis/T
gr dinti/STXltvx
g briuotis/T
gumuliuoti/NTX
gurn ti/NTXe
hermetinti/NTX
ilginti/NTXefiru
ingzti/NTX
intonuoti/NTX
i austi/STX
i dumblinti/STX
i kinkyti/STX
i meduoti/STX
i pliurpti/STX
i sibr  kuoti/STX
i sijuodinti/STX
i similtuoti/STX
i siriebaluoti/STX
i tiesinti/STX
jaudinti/NTXf
jovytis/T
juostyti/NTX
kaimynauti/NTX
kalb ti/STXabcdefhijklnopqrvwx
kampuoti/NTX
kapoti/NSTXabcdefijklruvwx
karpyti/NTXcj
kasytis/T
kauptis/T
keikti/NSTXabdfiklpqruvw
kepdinti/NTX
ker ytis/T
ke ti/NTXdekl
kildyti/NTX
kiog d ti/NTX
kirsti/NSTXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
kivyk  ioti/NTX
klaktel ti/NTX
kleg ti/NTXcdk
klest ti/NTXk
kliokti/NTXjl
klykdyti/NTX
klumps ti/NTX
knaptel ti/NTX
kniausyti/NTX
kniurvintis/T
kompiliuotis/T
konservuoti/NTXlx
koreguoti/NTXfk
kramstel ti/NTX
kraustin ti/NTX
krenks ti/NTX
krimsti/STXabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
krypin ti/NTX
krustel ti/NTX
kuk ti/NTX
kumpsoti/NTX
k prin ti/NTX
kuruoti/NTX
kvaknoti/NTX
kvepinti/STXdjpv
kvyktel ti/NTX
laipsniuoti/NTXd
lamstuoti/NTX
lasiotis/T
lebedyti/NTX
lepenti/NTXjk
liepsnoti/NSTXefiklmopux
linguoti/NTXbcdefgijklnor
li liuoti/NTXdfkl
lyp tis/T
luops ti/NTX
mai ytis/T
malonintis/T
markinti/NTX
materializuoti/STXfhjkrvw
mazgotis/T
mei ti/NTX
m rin ti/NTX
mies ion ti/NTXk
mineral ti/NTX
mitinti/NTXcdei
mokytojauti/NTX
muilintis/T
murksoti/NTXf
naikintis/T
nasrioti/NTX
ne ikauti/NTX
niokoti/NTXaek
niurti/NTXfk
nubosti/STX
nuimlioti/NTX
nuodyti/STXadejlmpqx
nusibastyti/NTX
nusikleipti/STX
nusisvilinti/STX
nutvieksti/NTX
ornamentuoti/NTX
padebesuoti/NTX
paikinti/NTXd
pakilnoti/NTX
paliegti/NTX
panaktiniauti/NTX
parametrizuoti/NTX
parsiinkti/STX
pasib g ti/STX
pasigard iuoti/NTX
pasiknebin ti/STX
pasipa yti/STX
pasismaukti/STX
pasivo ti/STX
pastalginti/NTX
pauk  iauti/NTX
pa ied ti/NTX
pend ti/NTXk
persibr  ti/STX
piemenauti/NTX
pikt od iauti/NTX
pirkdinti/NTXl
pyraginti/NTX
plaukyti/NTXdf
plerk ti/NTX
pliaupti/NTXdfjlx
pliumpti/NTX
plyninti/NTX
plunksnuoti/NSTXm
ponuoti/NTXk
prakaituoti/NTXdfjkl
prasigiedryti/NTX
prausti/STXabdemnpq
priekai tauti/NTXf
prikepinti/STX
prisi sti/STX
prisi luoti/NTX
pritelkti/NTX
p dymauti/NTX
purp ioti/NTX
ragintis/T
ranguoti/STX
r  ytis/T
reorganizuoti/NTX
riebaluotis/T
rykauti/NTX
r pintis/T
salstel ti/NTX
segti/NSTXabcdefjklnopqrvwx
siedinti/NTX
siusti/NTXabcfhlopv
skardentis/T
skilti/NTXbcehik
skriausti/NTXe
slidinti/NTXce
smegtel ti/NTX
snopsoti/NTX
spiestis/T
springdyti/NTX
staliauti/NTX
stipr ti/NTXfk
striukinti/NTXfk
sudabinti/NTX
sukinkyti/STX
sumeduoti/STX
surankioti/STX
susigodoti/STX
susinarinti/STX
susivarvinti/STX
sutrai kyti/STX
sveikintis/T
tala yti/NTX
tarti/NSTXabcdefhijklmpqrtuvwx
telk oti/NTX
tiesti/NSTXacdefghijklnopqrvw
tir tinti/NTXefk
trak tel ti/NTX
treps ti/NTXfk
triu kinti/NTXk
t pauti/NTX
tvarkin ti/NTX
uld ti/NTX
u gaulioti/NTX
u plmekti/STX
u simir ti/NSTX
u  ibinti/STX
vaistininkauti/NTX
vap ioti/NTX
vauks ti/NTX
veltin ti/NTX
vestis/T
vilgtel ti/NTX
virs ioti/NTX
vyturiuotis/T
zyztel ti/NTX
